da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Kabelstyring > Patchpaneler: Patch-paneler til lyd og video; Patch-paneler til ethernet; Fiberoptiske patch-paneler; Tilbehør og rammer til patch-panel
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Cable Management > Patch Panels: Audio & Video Patch Panels; Ethernet Patch Panels; Fiber Optic Patch Panels; Patch Panel Accessories & Frames
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Kablo Yönetimi > Bağlantı Panoları: Ses ve Video Patch Panelleri; Ethernet Patch Panelleri; Fiber Optik Patch Panelleri; Patch Panel Aksesuarları ve Çerçeveleri
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Gestão de cabos > Patch Panels: Painéis de ligação de áudio e vídeo; Painéis de ligação ethernet; Painéis de ligação de fibra ótica; Acessórios e estruturas para painéis de ligação
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Gerenciamento de cabos > Painel de conexões: Patch panels de áudio e vídeo; Patch panels Ethernet; Patch panels de fibra óptica; Acessórios e estruturas para patch panel
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Gestion des câbles > Panneaux de brassage: Panneaux de brassage audio-vidéo; Panneaux de brassage Ethernet; Panneaux de brassage fibre optique; Accessoires et châssis pour panneaux de brassage
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 케이블 정리 > 패치 패널: 오디오 및 비디오 패치 패널; 이더넷 패치 패널; 광섬유 패치 패널; 패치 패널 액세서리 및 프레임
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Vođenje kabela > Patch paneli: Prespojne ploče za zvuk i video; Prespojne ploče za ethernet; Prespojne ploče za optička vlakna; Dodaci i okviri za prespojne ploče
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Zarządzanie kablami > Krosownice: Panele patchbay audio i wideo; Panele patchbay Ethernet; Panele patchbay światłowodowe; Akcesoria i ramy panelu patchbay
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Прокладка кабелей > Коммутационные панели: Коммутационные панели для аудио и видео; Коммутационные панели Ethernet; Оптоволоконные коммутационные панели; Аксессуары и рамки для коммутационных панелей
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Kaapelihallinta > Kytkentäpaneelit: Audio- ja videopaneelit; Ethernet-kytkentäpaneelit; Valokuitukytkentäpaneelit; Kytkentäpaneelitarvikkeet ja -kehykset
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Kabelhantering > Patchpaneler: Ljud- och videopatchpaneler; Ethernet-patchpaneler; Fiberoptiska patchpaneler; Patchpaneltillbehör och ramar
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Kabel-Management > Schalttafeln: Audio- und Video-Patchfelder; Ethernet-Patchfelder; Glasfaser-Patchfelder; Patchfeld-Zubehör und -Rahmen
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Διαχείριση καλωδίων > Πίνακες διασύνδεσης: Πίνακες διασύνδεσης ήχου & βίντεο; Πίνακες διασύνδεσης Ethernet; Πίνακες διασύνδεσης οπτικών ινών; Αξεσουάρ & πλαίσια πίνακα διασύνδεσης
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Kabels wegwerken > Patchpanelen: Audio en video patchpanelen; Ethernet patchpanelen; Glasvezel patchpanelen; Patchpaneel accessoires en frames
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Gestionarea cablurilor > Dispozitive cu porturi multiple: Panouri de conexiune audio și video; Panouri de conexiune Ethernet; Panouri de conexiune pentru fibră optică; Accesorii și cadre pentru panouri de conexiune
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 电缆/电线整理用品 > 配线架: 音视频配线架; 以太网配线架; 光纤配线架; 配线架配件和框架
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > การจัดการสายเคเบิล > แผงแพตช์: แพนเนลแจ็กเสียงและวิดีโอ; แพนเนลแจ็กอีเทอร์เน็ต; แพนเนลแจ็กไฟเบอร์ออปติก; อุปกรณ์เสริมและเฟรมแพนเนลแจ็ก
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Cableado > Paneles de parcheo: Paneles de conexión de audio y video; Paneles de conexión Ethernet; Paneles de conexión de fibra óptica; Accesorios y marcos de panel de conexión
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電線管理 > 跳線面板: 音訊與視訊配線架; 乙太網路配線架; 光纖配線架; 配線架配件與框架
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Uspořádání kabelů > Patch panely: Audio a video patch panely; Ethernetové patch panely; Patch panely optických vláken; Příslušenství a rámy pro patch panely
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kabelių tvarkymas > Komutaciniai skydeliai: Garso ir vaizdo skirstymo plokštės; Eterneto skirstymo plokštės; Šviesolaidinės skirstymo plokštės; Skirstymo plokščių priedai ir rėmai
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Quản lý cáp > Bảng cắm cáp mạng: Bảng vá âm thanh và video; Bảng vá Ethernet; Bảng vá sợi quang; Phụ kiện và khung bảng vá
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Управление на кабели > Комуникационни панели: Аудио и ведео пач панели; Ethernet пач панели; Оптични  пач панели; Аксесоари и рамки за пач панели
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > ケーブル管理 > パッチパネル: オーディオ・ビデオパッチパネル; イーサネットパッチパネル; 光ファイバーパッチパネル; パッチパネルアクセサリー・フレーム
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Kabelhåndtering > Patchepaneler: Lyd- og video patch-paneler; Ethernet patch-paneler; Fiberoptiske patch-paneler; Tilbehør og rammer til patch-paneler
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Urejanje kablov > Spojne plošče: Avdio in video priključne plošče; Ethernet priključne plošče; Optične priključne plošče; Dodatki in okvirji za priključne plošče
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Organizácia kabeláže > Rozvádzače: Audio a video prepájacie panely; Ethernetové prepájacie panely; Optické prepájacie panely; Príslušenstvo prepájacích panelov a rámy
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Kábelkezelés > Patch panelek: Audio és videó patch-panelek; Ethernet patch-panelek; Optikai szálas patch-panelek; Patch-panel kiegészítői és keretei
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Gestione dei cavi > Pannelli di permutazione: Pannelli patch audio e video; Pannelli patch ethernet; Pannelli patch in fibra ottica; Accessori e telai del pannello patch